Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-2710
Fees.

(1) The department shall adopt a schedule of fees for initial registration, annual registration renewal, and limited registration, not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars for initial registration, one thousand five hundred dollars for annual registration renewal, and one thousand dollars for limited registration. Such fees shall not exceed those reasonably necessary for the administration of the Professional Employer Organization Registration Act.

(2) Fees imposed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Contractor, Business, and Professional Employer Organization Registration Cash Fund.

Laws 2010, LB579, § 10;

Laws 2016, LB270, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB847, § 21.
July 18, 2026